trunk/apertium-es-ssp/apertium-es-ssp.ssp.dix
<pardef n="/ihsòmimuha:emec__vblex">
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>ihsòmimuha:emec</l> 
        <r>ihsòmimuha:emec<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e>
      <p>
        <l>ihsòmimuha:emec</l> 
        <r>ihsòmimuha:emec<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ihsòmimuha:emec</l> 
        <r>ihsòmimuha:emec<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>   
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ihsòmimuha:emec</l> 
        <r>ihsòmimuha:emec<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e> 
 <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ihsòmimuha:emec</l> 
        <r>ihsòmimuha:emec<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ihsòmimuha:emec</l> 
        <r>ihsòmimuha:emec<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ihsòmimuhe:emoc</l> 
        <r>ihsòmimuha:emec<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
     <e>
      <p>
        <l>ihsòmimuhe:emoc</l> 
        <r>ihsòmimuha:emec<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   

   <e>
      <p>
        <l>ihsòmimuhe:emoc</l> 
        <r>ihsòmimuha:emec<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ihsòmimuhe:emoc</l> 
        <r>ihsòmimuha:emec<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylihsòmìmuhe:emóc</l> 
        <r>ihsòmimuha:emec<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylihsòmìmuhe:emóc</l> 
        <r>ihsòmimuha:emec<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

  <e>
      <p>
        <l>ihsòmimuha:emec</l> 
        <r>ihsòmimuha:emec<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ihsòmimuha:emec</l> 
        <r>ihsòmimuha:emec<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

  <e>
      <p>
        <l>ihsòmimuha:emec</l> 
        <r>ihsòmimuha:emec<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ihsòmimuha:emec</l> 
        <r>ihsòmimuha:emec<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


 <e>
      <p>
        <l>elihsòmémuha:emèc</l> 
        <r>ihsòmimuha:emec<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>elihsòmémuha:emèc</l> 
        <r>ihsòmimuha:emec<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylihsòmimuha:eméc</l> 
        <r>ihsòmimuha:emec<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylihsòmimuha:eméc</l> 
        <r>ihsòmimuha:emec<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylihsòmimuha:eméc</l> 
        <r>ihsòmimuha:emec<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ylihsòmimuha:eméc</l> 
        <r>ihsòmimuha:emec<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
 
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ilihsòmémuha:emèc</l> 
        <r>ihsòmimuha:emec<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ilihsòmémuha:emèc</l> 
        <r>ihsòmimuha:emec<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>



<pardef n="/s:aeimedaho__vblex">
      <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:aeimedaho</l> 
        <r>s:aeimedaho<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e>
      <p>
        <l>s:aeimedaho</l> 
        <r>s:aeimedaho<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>s:aeimedaho</l> 
        <r>s:aeimedaho<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>   
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>s:aeimedaho</l> 
        <r>s:aeimedaho<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e> 
 <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>s:aeimedaho</l> 
        <r>s:aeimedaho<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>s:aeimedaho</l> 
        <r>s:aeimedaho<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:aeimafahodaho</l> 
        <r>s:aeimedaho<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
     <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:aeimafahodaho</l> 
        <r>s:aeimedaho<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   

   <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:aeimafahodaho</l> 
        <r>s:aeimedaho<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:aeimafahodaho</l> 
        <r>s:aeimedaho<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>yls:aeimamufahodaho</l> 
        <r>s:aeimedaho<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>yls:aeimamufahodaho</l> 
        <r>s:aeimedaho<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

  <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:aeimedaho</l> 
        <r>s:aeimedaho<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:aeimedaho</l> 
        <r>s:aeimedaho<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

  <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:aeimedaho</l> 
        <r>s:aeimedaho<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>s:aeimedaho</l> 
        <r>s:aeimedaho<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>


 <e>
      <p>
        <l>yls:aeimèdaho</l> 
        <r>s:aeimedaho<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>yls:aeimèdaho</l> 
        <r>s:aeimedaho<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   <e>
      <p>
        <l>eyls:aeimédaho</l> 
        <r>s:aeimedaho<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eyls:aeimédaho</l> 
        <r>s:aeimedaho<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eyls:aeimédaho</l> 
        <r>s:aeimedaho<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>eyls:aeimédaho</l> 
        <r>s:aeimedaho<s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
 
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ils:aeimèdaho</l> 
        <r>s:aeimedaho<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ils:aeimèdaho</l> 
        <r>s:aeimedaho<s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

<e lm="s:aeimedaho"><par n="/s:aeimedaho__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ihsòmimuha:emec"><par n="/ihsòmimuha:emec__vblex"/></e>
